Utah statutes.
70A-5-120.   Savings clause.
A transaction arising out of or associated with a letter of credit that was
issued before July 1, 1997, and the rights, obligations, and interests flowing
from that transaction are governed by any statute or other law amended or
repealed by this act as if repeal or amendment had not occurred and may be
terminated, completed, consummated, or enforced under that statute or other
law.
